Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB736.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 365 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Credit card processor" or "processor":
1. Means a person that processes credit card or electronic commerce
transactions on behalf of a business for a fee; and
2. Includes:
a. A merchant services provider;
b. A financial institution;
c. An independent sales organization; and
d. Any subsidiary or affiliate of a person listed in this
subparagraph; and
(b) "Merchant processing agreement" or "agreement":
1. Means a contract between a credit card processor and a business
under which the business agrees to pay the credit card processor for
processing credit card or electronic commerce transactions on behalf
of the business; and
2. Includes any gift or sale of equipment or personal property that is
made to a business from a credit card processor in connection with an
agreement by the credit card processor to process credit card or
electronic commerce transactions on behalf of the business.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, a credit card processor shall
not assess or charge a business a fee, fine, or penalty, including liquidated
damages, under a merchant processing agreement:
(a) That exceeds the greater of the following for terminating the agreement
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/19/2026 9:11 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2089
before the expiration of the term agreed upon by the processor and
business:
1. Five hundred dollars ($500); or
2. The unreimbursed cost of any equipment or other personal property
gifted or sold under the agreement; or
(b) For failing or declining to:
1. Renew the agreement; or
2. Enter into a subsequent merchant processing agreement.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, a credit card processor shall:
(a) Disclose clearly and conspicuously in bold twelve (12) point font the
following information on the signature page of a merchant processing
agreement:
1. The amount of any fee, fine, or penalty, including liquidated damages,
that may be assessed or charged by the credit card processor to the
business for termination of the agreement before the expiration of the
term agreed upon by the processor and business;
2. The expiration date of the agreement;
3. If applicable, the renewal date of the agreement; and
4. The customer service contact information of the credit card processor,
including telephone number, mailing address, and email address;
(b) Ensure that a merchant processing agreement contains, in addition to the
business signatory's signature, the initials of the business signatory next to
the information required under paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Provide a copy of a merchant processing agreement that contains the
information required under, and is initialed and signed in accordance with,
this subsection to a business:
1. In electronic or paper format; and
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/19/2026 9:11 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2089
2. At the time the business enters into the agreement.
(4) (a) Any provision of a merchant processing agreement that violates subsection
(2) of this section shall be void and unenforceable.
(b) If a credit card processor violates subsection (3) of this section, any
provision in the merchant processing agreement that assesses or charges an
early termination fee, fine, or penalty, including liquidated damages, to the
business shall be void and unenforceable.
(5) This section shall not apply to a merchant processing agreement that:
(a) May be terminated without the credit card processor assessing or charging a
fee, fine, or penalty, including liquidated damages; or
(b) Is entered into by a business that:
1. Generates more than two million five hundred thousand dollars
($2,500,000) in credit card or electronic commerce transactions each
year; and
2. Employs more than thirty (30) employees.
(6) (a) The remedies and penalties set forth in this section shall be cumulative.
(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or restrict the powers,
duties, remedies, or penalties available to any person under any other
statutory or common law.
Section 2. This Act applies to contracts entered on or after the effective date of
this Act.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/19/2026 9:11 AM Jacketed